Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 3. Catering Licenses and Permits

§ 241.
Caterer’s license; commercial catering license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may issue a caterer’s license or a commercial catering license to a person who holds a first-class license or first- and third-class licenses.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery shall adopt rules as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 44

, § 5, eff. April 15, 1975; amended

1987, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 11, 1988;

2011, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 23

, § 81;

2017, No. 83

, § 47;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 45.

§ 242.
Destination resort master licenses.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a destination resort master license to a person that operates a destination resort if the applicant files an application with the Board of Liquor and Lottery accompanied by the license fee provided in section 204 of this title. In addition to any information required pursuant to rules adopted by the Board, the application shall:

designate all licensed caterers and commercial caterers that are proposed to be permitted to cater individual events within the boundaries of the resort pursuant to the destination resort master license;

demonstrate that the destination resort:

contains at least 100 acres of land; and

offers at least 50 units of sleeping accommodations; and

include a plan of the destination resort that sets forth:

the destination resort boundaries;

the ownership of the destination resort lands;

the location and general design of buildings and other improvements within the resort boundaries; and

the location of any sports and recreational facilities within the resort boundaries.

A licensee may, upon five days’ notice to the Division, amend the list of licensed caterers and commercial caterers that are designated in the destination resort master license.

The holder of the destination resort master license shall, at least two days prior to the date of the event, provide the Division and local control commissioners with written notice of an event within the resort boundaries that will be catered pursuant to the master license. A licensed caterer or commercial caterer that is designated in the master license shall not be required to obtain a request-to-cater permit to cater an event occurring within the destination resort boundaries if the master licensee has provided the Division and local control commissioners with the required notice pursuant to this subsection.

Real estate of a destination resort master license holder that is not contiguous with the license holder’s principal premises or is located in a different municipality from the license holder’s principal premises may be included in the destination resort’s boundaries if it is clearly identified and delineated on the plan of the destination resort that is submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 46.

§ 243.
Request-to-cater permit.

The Division of Liquor Control may issue a request-to-cater permit to the holder of a caterer’s license or commercial caterer’s license if the licensee:

submits an application for the permit on a form prescribed by the Commissioner;

receives approval for the proposed event from the local control commissioners; and

pays the fee required pursuant to section 204 of this title.

A request-to-cater permit shall authorize a licensed caterer or commercial caterer to serve alcoholic beverages at an individual event as set forth in the permit.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 48; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 47.